North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 3. Special County Attorneys for Social Service Matters.

§ 108A-16.
Appointment.

With the approval of the board of social services, the board of commissioners of any county may appoint a licensed attorney to serve as a special county attorney for social service matters, or designate the county attorney as special county attorney for social service matters.

History.

1959, c. 1124, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-17.
Compensation.

The special county attorney for social service matters shall receive compensation for the performance of his duties and for his expenses in such amount as the board of commissioners may provide. His compensation shall be a proper item in the annual budget of the county department of social services.

History.

1959, c. 1124, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-18.
Duties and responsibilities.

The special county attorney shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To serve as legal advisor to the county director, the county board of social services, and the board of county commissioners on social service matters;

To represent the county, the plaintiff, or the obligee in all proceedings brought under Chapter 52A, the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act and to exercise continuous supervision of compliance with any order entered in any proceeding under that act;

To represent the county board of social services in appeal proceedings and in any litigation relating to appeals;

To assist the district attorney with the preparation and prosecution of criminal cases under Article 40 of Chapter 14, entitled “Protection of the Family”;

To assist the district attorney with the preparation and prosecution of proceedings authorized by Chapter 49, entitled “Bastardy” [Children Born Out of Wedlock];

To perform such other duties as may be assigned to him by the board of county commissioners, the board of social services, or the director of social services.

In performing any of the duties and responsibilities set out in this section, the special county attorney is authorized to call upon any director of social services or the Department of Health and Human Services for any information as he may require to perform his duties, and such director and Department are directed to assist him in performing such duties.

History.

1959, c. 1124, ss. 2, 3; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 476, s. 138; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§§ 108A-19 through 108A-23.

Reserved for future codification purposes.